Arkansas, session 2025, HB1128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee
for the 2024-2025 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: ten (10) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee,
to be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for operating expenses of
the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee
*JAR039*
01/15/2025 8:51:28 AM JAR039

HB1128
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) EXTRA HELP $38,400
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 8,820
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $47,220

SECTION 3. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 4. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 6. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that funds provided by the General Assembly for the
operations of the Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint
Auditing Committee are, due to unforeseen circumstances, insufficient for the
Arkansas Legislative Audit of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to
continue to provide essential governmental services; that the provisions of
this act will provide the necessary monies for the Arkansas Legislative Audit
of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee to continue such services; and
that a delay in the effective date of this Act could work irreparable harm
01/15/2025 8:51:28 AM JAR039

HB1128
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its
passage and approval.
If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall
become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the
Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the
veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house
overrides the veto.


























01/15/2025 8:51:28 AM JAR039